California statutes. Public Contract Code
(g) A sale of real property acquired after January 1, 1985, through eminent domain proceedings initiated by the Regents of the University of California. In those cases, the person from whom the property was acquired shall be notified and be accorded an exclusive opportunity for 90 days to purchase the property at its fair market value. If the person fails to undertake proceedings to purchase the property within 90 days, the
 procedures specified in Sections 10511 and 10512 shall then be followed in the sale of the property.

(h) An exchange to acquire real property of another person or entity for university purposes. Any exchange shall be upon terms and conditions agreed to by the exchanging parties.

(i) The transfer of the Rochdale Apartments located at 2424 Haste Street, in the City of Berkeley, County of Alameda, Assessor Parcel Number 55-1881-17-1, from the Regents of the University of California to the Berkeley Student Cooperative for the purpose of maintaining affordable housing. The Regents of the University of California shall reserve a right of reverter, which may be subordinated at the discretion of the regents and would be subject to existing liens and obligations of the property, in the event the property ceases to be used for affordable housing by the Berkeley Student Cooperative and its
 successors or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 764, Sec. 1.   (SB 56)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conflict of Interest [10515. - 10518.]

10515.

(a) No person, firm, or subsidiary thereof who has been awarded a consulting services contract may submit a bid for, nor be awarded a contract on or after July 1, 2003, for the provision of services, procurement of goods or supplies, or any other related action that is required, suggested, or otherwise deemed appropriate in the end product of the consulting services contract.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Any person, firm, or subsidiary thereof who is awarded a subcontract of a consulting services contract that amounts to no more than 10 percent of the total monetary value of the consulting services contract.

(2) Consulting services contracts that comply with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10510.4).

(c) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any person, firm, or subsidiary awarded a consulting services contract by a University of California medical center when the provision of service, procurement of goods or supplies, or any other related action required, suggested, or otherwise deemed appropriate in the end product of the consulting services contract, is necessary to avoid a competitive disadvantage in the hospital industry, improve patient care, protect the privacy of patient information, or avoid significant delay and additional expense.

(2) The University of California shall report within 30 days on any exemption granted under paragraph (1) to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance. The report shall include a description of the circumstances that warranted the exemption, the effects of the exemption on patient care or patient privacy, and a calculation of the projected costs savings to the institution as a result of the exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10516.

No officer or employee of the University of California shall engage in any employment, activity, or enterprise from which the officer or employee receives compensation or in which the officer or employee has a financial interest if that employment, activity, or enterprise is sponsored or funded, or sponsored and funded, by any university department through or by a university contract unless the employment, activity, or enterprise is within the course and scope of the officer’s or employee’s regular university employment. No officer or employee in the university shall contract on his or her own individual behalf as an independent contractor with any university department to provide services or goods. This section shall not apply to officers or employees of the
 university with teaching or research responsibilities, nor shall it apply to student employees for payment for additional campus activities or engagements outside of the scope of their primary university employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   (SB 1122)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10517.

(a) No retired, dismissed, separated, or formerly employed person of the University of California employed with the university or otherwise appointed to serve in the university may enter into a contract in which he or she engaged in any of the negotiations, transactions, planning, arrangements, or any part of the decisionmaking process relevant to the contract while employed in any capacity by any university department. The prohibition of this subdivision shall apply to a person only during the two-year period beginning on the date the person left university employment.

(b) For a period of 12 months following the date of his or her retirement, dismissal, or separation from the University of California, no person employed in the university or otherwise appointed to serve in the university may enter into a contract with any university department, if he or she was employed by that department in a policymaking position in the same general subject area as the proposed contract within the 12-month period prior to his or her retirement, dismissal, or separation. The prohibition of this subdivision shall not apply to a contract requiring the person’s services as an expert witness in a civil case or to a contract for the continuation of an attorney’s services on a matter he or she was involved with prior to leaving the university.

(c) This section does not prohibit the rehire or reappointment of University of California employees after retirement, consistent with university administrative policies, nor does it apply to inventors and authors of intellectual property licensed under technology transfer agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1122, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

10518.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), each contractor who enters into a contract with a University of California campus for ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more shall be assigned an identification number by the chancellor of that university campus. Each contractor who has been assigned a number shall list it on each contract the contractor enters into with the university campus, regardless of the amount of the contract. In the case of a corporation or firm, the chancellor’s assigned number shall be used exclusively on each contract with that particular chancellor’s campus. The assigned number shall remain unchanged regardless of future name changes.

(b) If the identification numbers cannot be tracked centrally by the Regents of the University of California, then the regents, and not the chancellors, shall assign the identification numbers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Remedies and Penalties [10520. - 10527.]

10520.

Every contract or other transaction entered in violation of any provision of this chapter is void, unless the violation is technical or nonsubstantive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1122, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

10521.

The University of California, or any person acting on behalf of the university, may bring a civil action seeking a determination by the superior court that a contract or other transaction has been entered in violation of any provision of this chapter. If the court finds substantial evidence of a violation, it may issue a temporary injunction to prevent any further dealings upon the contract or other transaction, pending a final determination on the merits of the case. If the action results in a final determination that the contract or other transaction has been entered in violation of this chapter, it shall be void, and the state or person bringing the action shall be awarded costs and attorney’s fees. This section shall not be construed to permit an award of costs and attorney fees to the person or entity contracting or otherwise transacting with the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1122, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

10522.

Any officer or employee of the University of California who corruptly performs any official act under this chapter to the injury of the university is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1122, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

10523.

Any person contracting with the University of California by oral or written contract who corruptly permits the violation of any contract made under this chapter is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1122, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

10524.

Persons convicted under Section 10522 or 10523 are also liable to the University of California for double the amount the university may have lost or be liable to lose by reason of the acts made crimes by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 242.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10525.

Willful violation of any other provision of this chapter shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1122, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative July 1, 2003, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1122.)
-------------------------------------------

10526.

Sections 10522, 10523, 10524, and 10525 of this article do not apply to violations of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 10510.4) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 699, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10527.

This article does not apply to violations of Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 10510.50) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 480, Sec. 2.   (SB 27)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. California State University Contract Law [10700. - 11005.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10700. - 10710.]

10700.

This chapter may be cited as the California State University Contract Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10701.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Project” includes the erection, construction, alteration, painting, repair, or improvement of any state structure, building, road, or other state improvement of any kind. “Project” includes a project located on California State University property and performed pursuant to a contract entered into or awarded by an auxiliary organization, as defined in Section 89901 of the Education Code, and funded in whole or in part by public funds.

(b) “Service contract” means any contract for services in connection with a project other than a project contract, and includes, but is not limited to, contracts for architectural, engineering, planning, testing, general studies, or feasibility services.

(c) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University and their designees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 346, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

Contracts for the purchase of supplies or materials, which are purchased through the Department of General Services, are not subject to this chapter, even though the seller is required to perform some incidental work or service in connection with the delivery of the material or supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

Work done directly by any public utility company pursuant to order of the Public Utilities Commission or other public authority, is not subject to this chapter, whether or not done under public supervision or paid for in whole or part out of public funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

The project shall be under the sole and direct control of the trustees, pursuant to the powers and responsibilities invested in them by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 66600) of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. For the purposes of this chapter, a project located on California State University property and performed pursuant to a contract entered into or awarded by an auxiliary organization, as defined in Section 89901 of the Education Code, and funded in whole or in part by public funds, shall be deemed to be under the sole and direct control of the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 346, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10705.

(a) When, in the opinion of the trustees, the work does not require the application of all of the provisions of this chapter in connection therewith, the trustees may carry out the project pursuant to this section if the estimated cost does not exceed the value of a minor capital outlay project for which, pursuant to Section 10108, the services of the Department of General Services are not required and a state agency or department is authorized to carry out its own project.

(b) If the estimated total cost of any construction project or work carried out under this section exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the trustees shall solicit bids in writing and shall award the work to the lowest responsible bidder or reject all bids. The trustees may carry out work in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) under this section by day labor if the trustees deem that the award of a contract, the acceptance of bids, or the acceptance of further bids is not in the best interests of the state, but the amount of work performed by day labor under this section shall not exceed the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 219, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10706.

The trustees and the Department of General Services may enter into an agreement under which the Department of General Services will carry out any of the functions of the trustees under this chapter, upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10706.5.

The trustees may enter into an agreement with an auxiliary organization, as defined in Section 89901 of the Education Code, under which the auxiliary organization may carry out any of the functions of the trustees under this chapter, upon terms that are mutually agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 346, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10707.

The trustees may enter into service contracts. Such contracts shall be subject only to Section 10820 and to such other provisions of this chapter, if any, as the trustees may from time to time designate as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10708.

(a) When, in the opinion of the trustees, the best interests of the California State University dictate, the trustees may enter into an agreement with a contractor to provide all or significant portions of the design services and construction of a project under this chapter. The contractor shall design the project pursuant to the scope of services set forth in the request for proposals, build the project, and present the completed project to the trustees for their approval and acceptance.

(b) Work under this section shall be carried out by a contractor chosen by a competitive bidding process that employs selection criteria in addition to cost. Any design work performed pursuant to this section shall be prepared and signed by an architect certificated pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) When the design of portions of the project permits the selection of subcontractors, the contractor shall competitively bid those portions. The contractor shall provide to the trustees a list of subcontractors whose work is in excess of one-half of 1 percent of the total project cost as soon as the subcontractors are identified. Once listed, the subcontractors shall have the rights provided in the Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 318, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10709.

Notwithstanding any provision of the California State University Contract Law and any other provision of law to the contrary, the trustees may enter into an energy conservation construction contract, on the terms it determines are in the best interests of the California State University if they find that the anticipated cost for the alterations effected by the energy conservation construction contract will be less than the anticipated marginal cost to the California State University of energy that would have been consumed by the California State University in the absence of those alterations. The letting of contracts pursuant to this section shall be conducted through competitive means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 522, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10710.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the trustees may award annual contracts that do not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) for repair or other repetitive work, or renovation or modification, to be done according to unit prices. The contracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, and shall be based primarily on plans and specifications for typical work. No project shall be performed under a contract of this type except by order of the trustees. No annual contracts may be awarded under these provisions for capital outlay projects, where the total cost of the project exceeds the value of a minor capital outlay project for which, pursuant to Section 10108, the services of the Department of General Services are not required and a state agency or department is authorized to carry out its own project.

(b) For purposes of this section, “unit price” means the amount paid for a single unit of an item of work, and “typical work” means a work description applicable universally or applicable to a large number of individual projects, as distinguished from work specifically described with respect to an individual project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 219, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans and Specifications [10720. - 10726.]

10720.

Before entering into any contract for a project, the trustees, pursuant to the powers invested in them by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 66600) of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, shall cause to be prepared full, complete, and accurate plans and specifications and estimates of cost, giving such directions as will enable any competent mechanic or other builder to carry them out.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10721.

The plans, specifications, and estimates of cost shall be approved by the trustees, and the original draft or a certified copy filed permanently in the office of the trustees before further action is taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.

Work on all projects shall be done under contract awarded to the lowest responsible bidder pursuant to this chapter, except that it may be done by day’s labor under the direction of the trustees, by contract upon informal bids, or by a combination thereof:

(a) When the trustees determine that an emergency exists due to an act of God, earthquake, flood, storm, fire, landslide, public disturbance, vandalism, or other unexpected cause which results in damage to a state-owned building, state-owned real property, or any improvements thereon, for work and remedial measures which are required immediately and which are necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.

The trustees shall annually, on or before December 31, report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the instances in which an exemption from the bidding process was allowed due to “unexpected causes.” 

(b) At any time after the approval of plans, specifications, and estimates of cost, if the trustees deem the advertising or award of a contract, the acceptance of any bid, or the acceptance of any further bids after the rejection of all submitted bids, is not in the best interests of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.

Upon the approval of the trustees the authorized employees of the trustees may, when proceeding upon the basis of day’s labor, let any subdivision or unit of the work by contract upon informal bids; but such work shall be let only to a holder of a valid state contractor’s license unless such work is exempt from such licensing requirement by any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10724.

Bids may be received and contracts awarded on a unit basis, that is, the bids compared upon the basis of estimates of the quantities of the work to be done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.

Except in unit basis contracts, contracts shall not be made exceeding in amount the estimates of costs approved by the trustees. Plans and specifications and estimates of costs, including expense of advertising and inspection, shall not be approved by the trustees requiring a greater expenditure of money than is appropriated for the specific purpose in the law authorizing the expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.

The trustees may receive bids for the construction of several public works projects at the California State University as a single project. Where more than one appropriation has been made for the several projects united as a single project under the provisions of this section, payments for the single project shall be made from the separate appropriations on such proportional basis as may be determined by the trustees and approved by the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 37.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advertisement for Bids [10740. - 10743.]

10740.

When it appears from the estimates of cost that the estimated contract price of any project will not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), the trustees may direct that public notice to bidders be given as follows:

(a) By publication for two consecutive insertions in a weekly trade paper of general circulation, published either in Los Angeles or San Francisco, devoted primarily to the dissemination of contract news among contracting firms; and

(b) Once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the project is located, or, if located in more than one county in such a newspaper in a county in which a major portion of the work is to be done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10741.

The notices shall state the time and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids and describe in general terms the work to be done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10742.

If it appears that the estimated contract price will exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), public notice to bidders shall be given by publication once a week for at least two consecutive weeks, or once a week for more than two consecutive weeks if such longer period of advertising is deemed necessary by the trustees, next preceding the day set for the receiving of bids:

(a) In two trade papers of general circulation, one published in Los Angeles and one in San Francisco, devoted primarily to the dissemination of contract and building news among contracting and building material supply firms; or

(b) In one newspaper of general
 circulation published in the county in which the major portion of the project is located, and in one such trade paper published in the county group, as defined in Section 187 of the Streets and Highways Code, in which the work is to be done; or

(c) Electronically on the California State University’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 38.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10743.

The notices shall state the time and place for the receiving and opening of sealed bids and that the bids will be required for the entire project and for the performance of segregate designated parts of the entire project, when the trustees determine that segregation is advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bids and Bidders [10760. - 10767.]

10760.

The trustees may require, and on contracts the estimated cost of which exceeds the value of a minor capital outlay project for which, pursuant to the first paragraph of Section 10108, the services of the Department of General Services are not required and a state agency or department is authorized to carry out its own project, the trustees shall require, from prospective bidders, answers to questions contained in a standard form of questionnaire and financial statement including a complete statement of the prospective bidder’s financial ability and experience in performing public works projects. When completed, the questionnaire and financial statement shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which pleadings in civil actions are verified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10761.

The trustees shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating bidders, on the basis of the standard questionnaires and financial statements, in respect to the size of the contracts upon which each bidder is qualified to bid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10762.

In all projects for road, street, and bridge work where federal funds are involved and where a bidder is required to be and has been prequalified pursuant to Sections 10760 and 10761, no bid submitted or contract thereafter awarded shall be invalidated by the failure of the bidder or contractor to be properly licensed in accordance with the laws of this state, nor shall any such contractor be denied payment under any such contract because of such failure; provided, however, that the first payment for work or material under such contract shall not be made by the Controller unless and until the Registrar of Contractors certifies to him that the records of the Contractors’ State License Board indicate that such contractor was or became properly licensed between the time of bid opening and the making of the certification. Any bidder or contractor not so licensed shall be subject to all legal penalties imposed by such laws, including, but not limited to, any appropriate disciplinary action by the Contractors’ State License Board, and the trustees shall include a statement to that effect in the standard form of prequalification questionnaire and financial statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10763.

The questionnaires and financial statements are not public records and are not open to public inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10764.

The trustees shall furnish to each bidder a standard proposal form, which, when filled out and executed, may be submitted as the bid. Bids not presented on forms so furnished shall be disregarded. The trustees shall not furnish proposal forms to any person who is required to submit and has not submitted a questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification at least five days prior to the date fixed for publicly opening sealed bids and been prequalified for at least one day prior to that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10765.

(a) All bids shall be presented under sealed cover and accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security: cash, a cashier’s check, certified check, or a bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the trustees. The security shall be in an amount equal to at least 10 percent of the amount bid. A bid shall not be considered unless one of the forms of bidder’s security is enclosed with it.

(b) A bid described in subdivision (a) may be submitted electronically in accordance with Section 1601, but only if the bidder submits the bidder’s security required by subdivision (a) within 24 hours after the opening of bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 427, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10766.

Whether or not bids are opened exactly at the time fixed in the public notice for opening bids, a bid shall not be received after that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10767.

Any bid may be withdrawn at any time prior to the time fixed in the public notice for the opening of bids only by written request for the withdrawal of the bid filed with the trustees. The request shall be executed by the bidder or his or her duly authorized representative. The withdrawal of a bid does not prejudice the right of the bidder to file a new bid.

This section does not authorize the withdrawal of any bid after the time fixed in the public notice for the opening of bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Award of Contracts [10780. - 10785.]

10780.

On the day named in the public notice the trustees shall publicly open the sealed bids and award the contracts to the lowest responsible bidders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10780.5.

The trustees may require a bid for a public works contract to include prices for items that may be added to, or deducted from, the scope of work in the contract for which the bid is being submitted. Whenever additive or deductive items are included in a bid, the bid solicitation shall specify which one of the following methods will be used to determine the lowest bid. In the absence of such a specification, only the method provided by subdivision (a) will be used:

(a) The lowest bid shall be the lowest bid price on the base contract without consideration of the prices on the additive or deductive items.

(b) The lowest bid shall be the lowest total of the bid prices on the base contract and those additive or deductive items that were specifically identified in the bid solicitation as being used for the purpose of determining the lowest bid price.

(c) The lowest bid shall be the lowest total of the bid prices on the base contract and those additive or deductive items that, when taken in order from a specifically identified list of those items in the solicitation, and added to, or subtracted from, the base contract, are less than, or equal to, a funding amount publicly disclosed by the trustees before the first bid is opened.

(d) The lowest bid shall be determined in a manner that prevents any information that would identify any of the bidders or proposed subcontractors or suppliers from being revealed to the public entity before the ranking of all bidders from lowest to highest has been determined.

A responsible bidder who submitted the lowest bid as determined by this section shall be awarded the contract, if it is awarded. This section does not preclude the trustees from adding to or deducting from the contract any of the additive or deductive items after the lowest responsible bidder has been determined.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude the prequalification of subcontractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10781.

If the successful bidder fails to execute the contract, the bidder’s security shall be forfeited to the state. The cash or proceeds shall be deposited in the fund out of which the expenses of preparation and printing of the plans and specifications, estimates of cost, and publication of notice are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10782.

If the trustees deem it is for the best interest of the state, they may, on the refusal or failure of the successful bidder to execute the contract, award it to the second lowest responsible bidder.

If the second lowest responsible bidder fails or refuses to execute the contract, the trustees may likewise award it to the third lowest responsible bidder. 

On the failure or refusal of the second or third lowest bidder, to whom a contract is so awarded, to execute it, the bidder’s security shall be likewise forfeited to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.

The failure of the successful bidder to furnish any bond required by law, within the time fixed for execution of the contract, constitutes a failure to execute the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10784.

The bidder’s security of the second and third lowest responsible bidders may be withheld until the contract has been finally executed. The cash, cashier’s checks, and certified checks submitted by all other unsuccessful bidders shall be returned to them within 10 days after the contract is awarded, and their bidders’ bonds shall be of no further effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10785.

If the trustees deem the acceptance of the lowest responsible bid or bids is not for the best interests of the state, they may reject all bids and proceed by day’s labor or advertise for other bids in the manner required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contract Requirements [10820. - 10828.]

10820.

Every contract awarded under this chapter shall be submitted to the Attorney General or the attorney appointed according to law and authorized to represent the trustees. Such a contract is not binding on the state until the appropriate attorney finds it to be in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, and endorses such finding thereon.

A certified copy of each contract shall be filed with the Controller, but the failure to so file does not invalidate it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10821.

Every contract shall provide for the filing of separate performance and payment bonds by the contractor executed by an admitted surety insurer, subject to the approval of the trustees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10822.

Each bond shall be in a sum equal to at least one-half of the contract price, except as otherwise provided in Section 9554 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 46.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.

The payment bond shall secure the payment of the claims of laborers, mechanics, or materialmen employed on the work under the contract and shall contain all other provisions required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10824.

The performance bond shall guarantee the faithful performance of the contract by the contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10825.

No payment shall be made upon the contract to the contractor or any assignee of the contractor until an order by the trustees that a sufficient surety be substituted on the bond, or that a new, additional, or supplemental bond be given, is satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10826.

Every contract shall contain a provision in regard to the time when the whole or any specified portion of the work contemplated shall be completed, and shall provide that for each day completion is delayed beyond the specified time, the contractor shall forfeit and pay to the state a specified sum of money, to be deducted from any payments due or to become due to the contractor. The sum so specified is valid as liquidated damages unless manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances existing at the time the contract was made. A contract for a road project may also provide for the payment of extra compensation to the contractor, as a bonus for completion prior to the specified time, such provision, if used, to be included in the specifications and to clearly set forth the basis for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10827.

Every contract shall provide that the trustees may make changes in the plans and specifications pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10828.

Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2024, the California State University shall not approve a health benefit plan contract for employees that does not comply with the contraceptive coverage requirements of Sections 1367.25 and 1367.255 of the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 10123.1945 and 10123.196 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 630, Sec. 20.   (SB 523)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.8. Conflict of Interest [10830. - 10833.]

10830.

(a) No person, firm, or subsidiary thereof who has been awarded a consulting services contract may submit a bid or be awarded a contract on or after July 1, 2003, for the provision of services, the procurement of goods or supplies, or any other related action that is required, suggested, or otherwise deemed appropriate in the end product of the consulting services contract.
